Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Reciprocal Motor Fuel Tax on Out-of-State Vehicles

§ 3171.
Imposition and rate of reciprocal tax.

Whenever under the laws of any other state or province any tax or toll is imposed upon the use of gasoline or other motor fuel by residents of this State for the privilege of operating a motor vehicle upon the highways of such state or province, excepting, however, a tax or toll imposed upon gasoline or other motor fuel purchased within such state or province, a tax computed and applied in the same manner as the tax or toll of such other state or province shall be imposed by this State upon the use of gasoline or other motor fuel by motor vehicles registered in such other state or province so long as the tax or toll imposed by such other state or province shall remain in force.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3172.
Agreements for reciprocal waiver of tax.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may enter into reciprocal agreements with the appropriate officials of any other state or province under which he or she may waive all or any part of the requirements imposed by this subchapter, upon waiver of similar requirements by such state or province.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3173.
Gasoline or other motor fuel defined.

For the purpose of this subchapter, gasoline or other motor fuel shall be defined to mean any type of fuel, by whatever name it may be called, used in an internal combustion engine to generate power to propel a motor vehicle upon a highway.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3174.
Rules.

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may make rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.